New Mexico, session 2026, HB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 to carry out the provisions of the County and Tribal Health Councils Act. One million dollars ($1,000,000) of the appropriation shall be used to contract for services to assist the department of health with supporting county and tribal health councils in accordance with the County and Tribal Health Councils Act. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund.